Utah statutes.
62A-15-632.   Circumstances under which conditions justifying initial involuntary commitment shall be considered to continue to exist.

(1)  After a person has been involuntarily committed to the custody of a local mental health authority under Subsection 62A-15-631(10), the conditions justifying commitment under that subsection shall be considered to continue to exist, for purposes of continued treatment under Subsection 62A-15-631(11) or conditional release under Section 62A-15-637, if the court finds that the patient is still mentally ill, and that absent an order of involuntary commitment and without continued treatment he will suffer severe and abnormal mental and emotional distress as indicated by recent past history, and will experience deterioration in his ability to function in the least restrictive environment, thereby making him a substantial danger to himself or others.

(2)  A patient whose treatment is continued or who is conditionally released under the terms of this section, shall be maintained in the least restrictive environment available which can provide him with the treatment that is adequate and appropriate.

